Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-5,201
Inspection fees.

(1) The State Fire Marshal may establish by rules and regulations a schedule of reasonable inspections fees for each amusement ride. The cost of obtaining the certificate of inspection from a qualified inspector shall be borne by the owner of the amusement ride.

(2) A separate schedule of fees shall be established for the inspection of bungee jumping operations, including the inspection of cranes used for bungee jumping. The fees shall be established taking into consideration the cost of such inspections.

Laws 1987, LB 226, § 12;

Laws 1994, LB 608, § 4;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-1812;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 37.